Maryland, session 2025, HB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
12–115.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE STATE LOTTERY
AND GAMING CONTROL COMMISSION UNDER TITLE 9, SUBTITLES 1A THROUGH 1E
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “ONLINE SWEEPSTAKES GAME” MEANS A GAME, CONTEST,
OR PROMOTION THAT:
1. IS AVAILABLE ON THE INTERNET OR ACCESSIBLE ON
A MOBILE PHONE, COMPUTER TERMINAL, OR SIMILAR DEVICE;
2. UTILIZES A DUAL–CURRENCY SYSTEM OF PAYMENT
ALLOWING THE PLAYER TO EXCHANGE THE CURRENCY FOR ANY PRIZE OR AWARD
OR CASH OR CASH EQUIVALENTS, OR ANY CHANCE TO WIN ANY PRIZE OR AWARD OR
CASH OR CASH EQUIVALENTS; AND
3. SIMULATES:
A. CASINO–STYLE GAMING, SUCH AS SLOT MACHINES,
VIDEO POKER, AND TABLE GAMES, INCLUDING BLACKJACK, ROULETTE, CRAPS, AND
POKER;
B. LOTTERY GAMES, INCLUDING DRAW GAMES, INSTANT
WIN GAMES, KENO, AND BINGO; AND
C. SPORTS WAGERING.
(II) “ONLINE SWEEPSTAKES GAME” DOES NOT INCLUDE A GAME
THAT DOES NOT AWARD CASH PRIZES OR CASH EQUIVALENTS.

HOUSE BILL 1140 3
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE, CONDUCT, OR PROMOTE AN
ONLINE SWEEPSTAKES GAME IN THE STATE.
(2) AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE, A PERSON HOLDING A LICENSE,
OR A FINANCIAL INSTITUTION, PAYMENT PROCESSOR, GEOLOCATION PROVIDER,
GAMING CONTENT SUPPLIER, PLATFORM PROVIDER, OR MEDIA AFFILIATE OF A
PERSON HOLDING A LICENSE MAY NOT SUPPORT THE OPERATION, CONDUCTING, OR
PROMOTION OF AN ONLINE SWEEPSTAKES GAME IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A FINE NOT LESS THAN $10,000 AND NOT EXCEEDING
$100,000 OR BOTH.
(2) IF A PERSON IS FOUND IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE
STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL AGENCY SHALL DENY THE PERSON’S
LICENSE APPLICATION OR REVOKE A LICENSE HELD BY THE PERSON.
Article – State Government
9–1A–07.
(G) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET” MEANS A
JURISDICTION IN WHICH INTERACTIVE GAMING IS PROHIBITED BY THE LAWS OF
THAT JURISDICTION.
(III) “INTERACTIVE GAME CONTENT” MEANS HARDWARE,
SOFTWARE, APPLICATIONS, AND SERVERS USED TO OPERATE, CONDUCT, OR OFFER
INTERACTIVE GAMBLING GAMES.
(2) ON APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE UNDER § 9–1A–06(A)(2) OR (3)
OF THIS SUBTITLE AND ANNUALLY FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF THE LICENSE, AN
APPLICANT OR A LICENSE HOLDER SHALL SUBMIT A DISCLOSURE STATING, FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD, THE JURISDICTIONS IN WHICH THE
APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER OR ANY AFFILIATE OF THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE
HOLDER DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ACCEPTED REVENUE FROM THE SUPPLY OF
INTERACTIVE GAME CONTENT IN AN ILLEGAL INTERACTIVE GAMING MARKET.
(3) A MATERIAL MISREPRESENTATION OR OMISSION ON THE
DISCLOSURE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY, IN THE
DISCRETION OF THE COMMISSION, RESULT IN THE DENIAL OF AN APPLICATION FOR

HOUSE BILL 1140
A LICENSE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE OR, IN THE CASE OF A LICENSE HOLDER,
DISCIPLINARY ACTION, INCLUDING A SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF THE LICENSE
AND PENALTIES FOR OFFICERS OR BOARD MEMBERS OF THE LICENSE HOLDER.
[(g)] (H) (1) An individual may not knowingly give false information or make
a material misstatement in an application required for any license under this subtitle or in
any supplemental information required by the Commission.
(2) An individual who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or a fine not exceeding
$5,000 or both.
9–1A–08.1.
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO A PERSON REQUIRED
TO BE LICENSED UNDER § 9–1A–06(A)(2) OR (3) OF THIS SUBTITLE IF THE
APPLICANT OR ANY OF THE APPLICANT’S AFFILIATES, INCLUDING AN ENTITY UNDER
COMMON CONTROL, KNOWINGLY ACCEPTS REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM:
(1) A JURISDICTION ON THE BLACK LIST OF MONEY LAUNDERING
COUNTRIES ESTABLISHED BY THE FINANCIAL ACTION TASK FORCE;
(2) A JURISDICTION DESIGNATED AS A STATE SPONSOR OF
TERRORISM BY THE UNITED STATES; OR
(3) A JURISDICTION IN WHICH ONLINE CASINO GAMING IS
PROHIBITED AND THE REVENUE IS DERIVED FROM ONLINE CASINO GAMING IN THAT
JURISDICTION.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT ALLOW A PERSON REQUIRED TO BE
LICENSED UNDER § 9–1A–06(A)(2) OR (3) OF THIS SUBTITLE TO COMMENCE OR
CONTINUE OPERATIONS IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT THE PERSON OR
ANY OF THE PERSON’S AFFILIATES, INCLUDING ENTITIES UNDER COMMON
CONTROL, KNOWINGLY ACCEPTS REVENUE THAT IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY
DERIVED FROM A JURISDICTION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY REVOKE THE LICENSE OF A LICENSE
HOLDER THAT IS REQUIRED TO CEASE OPERATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF, AFTER NOTICE AND OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, THE
COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT IT WOULD FURTHER THE PUBLIC INTEREST TO
DISCONTINUE THE OPERATION OF THE LICENSE HOLDER IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1140 5
9–1E–03.
(a) (1) Unless the context requires otherwise, the requirements under §§
9–1A–04, 9–1A–06, 9–1A–07, 9–1A–08, 9–1A–08.1, 9–1A–12, 9–1A–14, 9–1A–18,
9–1A–19, 9–1A–20, and 9–1A–25 of this title apply to the authority, duties, and
responsibilities of the Commission, a sports wagering licensee, and an employee or a
contractor of a sports wagering licensee under this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.